Washington statutes.
RCW 10.05.110

Trial delay not grounds for dismissal.

Delay in bringing a case to trial caused by a petitioner requesting deferred prosecution as provided for in this chapter shall not be grounds for dismissal.

[ 1985 c 352 s 14; 1975 1st ex.s. c 244 s 11.]

NOTES:

Legislative finding—Severability—1985 c 352: See notes following RCW 10.05.010.